gc_lang/fr/dictionnaire/orthographe/FRANCAIS_7.aff
FLAG long
# messeoir (Classique) [I] | messoir [I] (Réforme 1990)
SFX pW Y 23
SFX pW   oir        oir/n'q'd'l'm't's'          oir                 po:infi
SFX pW   sseoir     sséant/n'q'd'l'm't's'       seoir               po:ppre                   di:M
SFX pW   ssoir      sséant/n'q'd'l'm't's'       soir                po:ppre                   di:R
SFX pW   sseoir     ssied/n'q'l'm't's'          seoir               po:ipre po:3sg            di:M
SFX pW   sseoir     ssiéent/n'q'l'm't's'        seoir               po:ipre po:3pl            di:M
SFX pW   ssoir      ssied/n'q'l'm't's'          soir                po:ipre po:3sg            di:R
SFX pW   ssoir      ssiéent/n'q'l'm't's'        soir                po:ipre po:3pl            di:R
SFX pW   sseoir     sseyait/n'q'l'm't's'        seoir               po:iimp po:3sg            di:M
SFX pW   sseoir     sseyaient/n'q'l'm't's'      seoir               po:iimp po:3pl            di:M
SFX pW   ssoir      sseyait/n'q'l'm't's'        soir                po:iimp po:3sg            di:R
SFX pW   ssoir      sseyaient/n'q'l'm't's'      soir                po:iimp po:3pl            di:R
SFX pW   sseoir     ssiéra/n'q'l'm't's'         seoir               po:ifut po:3sg            di:M
SFX pW   sseoir     ssiéront/n'q'l'm't's'       seoir               po:ifut po:3pl!           di:M
SFX pW   ssoir      ssiéra/n'q'l'm't's'         soir                po:ifut po:3sg            di:R
SFX pW   ssoir      ssiéront/n'q'l'm't's'       soir                po:ifut po:3pl!           di:R
SFX pW   sseoir     ssiérait/n'q'l'm't's'       seoir               po:cond po:3sg            di:M
SFX pW   sseoir     ssiéraient/n'q'l'm't's'     seoir               po:cond po:3pl            di:M
SFX pW   ssoir      ssiérait/n'q'l'm't's'       soir                po:cond po:3sg            di:R
SFX pW   ssoir      ssiéraient/n'q'l'm't's'     soir                po:cond po:3pl            di:R
SFX pW   sseoir     ssiée/n'q'l'm't's'          seoir               po:spre po:3sg            di:M
SFX pW   sseoir     ssiéent/n'q'l'm't's'        seoir               po:spre po:3pl            di:M
SFX pW   ssoir      ssiée/n'q'l'm't's'          soir                po:spre po:3sg            di:R
SFX pW   ssoir      ssiéent/n'q'l'm't's'        soir                po:spre po:3pl            di:R

# choir [I] | déchoir [I]
SFX pX Y 53
SFX pX   hoir       hoir/n'q'd'l'm't's'         choir               po:infi
SFX pX   hoir       hu/L'D'Q'                   choir               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pX   hoir       hus/D'Q'                    choir               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pX   hoir       hue/L'D'Q'                  choir               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pX   hoir       hues/D'Q'                   choir               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pX   hoir       hois/j'n'q'l'm't'           choir               po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoit/n'q'l'm't's'           choir               po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoyons/n'q'l't'             choir               po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoyez/n'q'l'm'              choir               po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoient/n'q'l'm't's'         choir               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoyais/j'n'q'l'm't'         déchoir             po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoyait/n'q'l'm't's'         déchoir             po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoyions/n'q'l't'            déchoir             po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoyiez/n'q'l'm'             déchoir             po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoyaient/n'q'l'm't's'       déchoir             po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pX   hoir       hus/j'n'q'l'm't'            choir               po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       hut/n'q'l'm't's'            choir               po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       hûmes/n'q'l't'              choir               po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       hûtes/n'q'l'm'              choir               po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       hurent/n'q'l'm't's'         choir               po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pX   hoir       hoirai/j'n'q'l'm't'         choir               po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pX   hoir       herrai/j'n'q'l'm't'         choir               po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoiras/n'q'l'm't'           choir               po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       herras/n'q'l'm't'           choir               po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoira/n'q'l'm't's'          choir               po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       herra/n'q'l'm't's'          choir               po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoirons/n'q'l't'            choir               po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       herrons/n'q'l't'            choir               po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoirez/n'q'l'm'             choir               po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       herrez/n'q'l'm'             choir               po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoiront/n'q'l'm't's'        choir               po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pX   hoir       herront/n'q'l'm't's'        choir               po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pX   hoir       hoirais/j'n'q'l'm't'        choir               po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       herrais/j'n'q'l'm't'        choir               po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoirait/n'q'l'm't's'        choir               po:cond po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       herrait/n'q'l'm't's'        choir               po:cond po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoirions/n'q'l't'           choir               po:cond po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       herrions/n'q'l't'           choir               po:cond po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoiriez/n'q'l'm'            choir               po:cond po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       herriez/n'q'l'm'            choir               po:cond po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoiraient/n'q'l'm't's'      choir               po:cond po:3pl
SFX pX   hoir       herraient/n'q'l'm't's'      choir               po:cond po:3pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoie/j'n'q'l'm't's'         choir               po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoies/n'q'l'm't'            choir               po:spre po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       husse/j'n'q'l'm't'          choir               po:simp po:1sg
SFX pX   hoir       husses/n'q'l'm't'           choir               po:simp po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       hût/n'q'l'm't's'            choir               po:simp po:3sg
SFX pX   hoir       hussions/n'q'l't'           choir               po:simp po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       hussiez/n'q'l'm'            choir               po:simp po:2pl
SFX pX   hoir       hussent/n'q'l'm't's'        choir               po:simp po:3pl
SFX pX   hoir       hois/n'l'm't'               déchoir             po:impe po:2sg
SFX pX   hoir       hoyons/n'l't'               déchoir             po:impe po:1pl
SFX pX   hoir       hoyez/n'l'm'                déchoir             po:impe po:2pl

# échoir [I]
SFX pY Y 26
SFX pY   choir      choir/n'q'd'l'm't's'        échoir              po:infi
SFX pY   choir      chéant/n'q'd'l'm't's'       échoir              po:ppre
SFX pY   choir      chu/d'q'                    échoir              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pY   choir      chus/d'q'                   échoir              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pY   choir      chue/d'q'                   échoir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pY   choir      chues/d'q'                  échoir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pY   choir      choit/n'q'l'm't's'          échoir              po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      chet/n'q'l'm't's'           échoir              po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      choient/n'q'l'm't's'        échoir              po:ipre po:3pl
SFX pY   choir      chéent/n'q'l'm't's'         échoir              po:ipre po:3pl
SFX pY   choir      choyait/n'q'l'm't's'        échoir              po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      choyaient/n'q'l'm't's'      échoir              po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pY   choir      chut/n'q'l'm't's'           échoir              po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      churent/n'q'l'm't's'        échoir              po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pY   choir      choira/n'q'l'm't's'         échoir              po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      cherra/n'q'l'm't's'         échoir              po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      choiront/n'q'l'm't's'       échoir              po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pY   choir      cherront/n'q'l'm't's'       échoir              po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pY   choir      choirait/n'q'l'm't's'       échoir              po:cond po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      cherrait/n'q'l'm't's'       échoir              po:cond po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      choiraient/n'q'l'm't's'     échoir              po:cond po:3pl
SFX pY   choir      cherraient/n'q'l'm't's'     échoir              po:cond po:3pl
SFX pY   choir      choie/n'q'l'm't's'          échoir              po:spre po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      choient/n'q'l'm't's'        échoir              po:spre po:3pl
SFX pY   choir      chût/n'q'l'm't's'           échoir              po:simp po:3sg
SFX pY   choir      chussent/n'q'l'm't's'       échoir              po:simp po:3pl

# pleuvoir [I,T] | repleuvoir [I,T]
# les formes au pluriel sont métaphoriques. ex: les malheurs pleuvront.
SFX pZ Y 19
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvoir/n'q'd'l'm't's'       pleuvoir            po:infi
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvant/n'q'd'l'm't's'       pleuvoir            po:ppre
SFX pZ   euvoir     u/q'                        pleuvoir            po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX pZ   euvoir     eut/n'q'l'm't's'            pleuvoir            po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvent/n'q'l'm't's'         pleuvoir            po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvait/n'q'l'm't's'         pleuvoir            po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvaient/n'q'l'm't's'       pleuvoir            po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pZ   euvoir     ut/n'q'l'm't's'             pleuvoir            po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     urent/n'q'l'm't's'          pleuvoir            po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvra/n'q'l'm't's'          pleuvoir            po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvront/n'q'l'm't's'        pleuvoir            po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvrait/n'q'l'm't's'        pleuvoir            po:cond po:3sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvraient/n'q'l'm't's'      pleuvoir            po:cond po:3pl
SFX pZ   euvoir     euve/n'q'l'm't's'           pleuvoir            po:spre po:3sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     ût/n'q'l'm't's'             pleuvoir            po:simp po:3sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     ussent/n'q'l'm't's'         pleuvoir            po:simp po:3pl!
SFX pZ   euvoir     eus/n'l'm't'                pleuvoir            po:impe po:2sg
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvons/n'l't'               pleuvoir            po:impe po:1pl
SFX pZ   euvoir     euvez/n'l'm'                pleuvoir            po:impe po:2pl

# falloir [T]
SFX qA Y 9
SFX qA   alloir     alloir/n'q'd'l'm't's'       falloir             po:infi
SFX qA   alloir     allu/q'                     falloir             po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX qA   alloir     aut/n'q'l'm't's'            falloir             po:ipre po:3sg
SFX qA   alloir     allait/n'q'l'm't's'         falloir             po:iimp po:3sg
SFX qA   alloir     allut/n'q'l'm't's'          falloir             po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX qA   alloir     audra/n'q'l'm't's'          falloir             po:ifut po:3sg
SFX qA   alloir     audrait/n'q'l'm't's'        falloir             po:cond po:3sg
SFX qA   alloir     aille/n'q'l'm't's'          falloir             po:spre po:3sg
SFX qA   alloir     allût/n'q'l'm't's'          falloir             po:simp po:3sg

# verbes en -clore ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
